Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3083.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Not later than 120 days following the passage of this act, the department of early
education and care shall develop a plan to expand background checks for licensure, employment,
and presence in programs licensed, approved, or funded by the department for applicants who
have resided outside of the United States in the previous five years, to include, to the maximum
feasible extent, all available international criminal record information. Said plan shall consider
the utilization of mechanisms including, but not limited to, background checks through
international databases and requirements for documentation from relevant custodians of criminal
records in foreign jurisdictions, including but not limited to letters of good standing. In
developing such plan the department shall take into account the availability of information, any
necessary changes to law, rule, or regulation to allow access to, and the use of, information, the
costs and time involved in accessing information, and the most efficient and effective means to
ensure that international criminal record information is incorporated into the department's
licensure and approval processes.
of 2

Said plan shall be filed with the clerks of the House and Senate, the Joint Committees on
the Judiciary and the Joint Committee on Education not later than 30 days following its
development, provided that it shall be implemented not later than 30 days following such filing
of 2